District of Columbia statutes.
6-915

Neglect by tenants or occupants.

If an uninhabitable or insanitary condition which has led to the condemnation of a building or part of building has been caused in any part by the action or by the neglect of the tenant or tenants, occupant or occupants thereof, such tenant, tenants, occupant, or occupants shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be liable to the penalties provided in § 6-916.

History

May 1, 1906, ch. 2073, § 15
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 889, ch. 1032
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 103(h), 48 DCR 1888

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-916.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-715.
1973 Ed., § 5-630.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-281 substituted “If an uninhabitable or insanitary condition” for “Whenever any insanitary condition”.